Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GRANTS TO NAVIGATORS.new text end new text begin $1,936,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the health care access fund to the commissioner of human services for grants to organizations with a MNsure grant services navigator assister contract in good standing as of the date of enactment. The grant payment to each organization must be in proportion to the number of medical assistance and MinnesotaCare enrollees each organization assisted that resulted in a successful enrollment in the second quarter of fiscal year 2025, as determined by MNsure's navigator payment process. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end